Utah statutes.
35A-2-202.   Employment counselors -- Specialization -- Employment plan.
(1)  At each employment center of a regional workforce services area
established under Section 35A-2-101 there shall be employed one or more
employment counselors.
(2)  A client shall be assigned one employment counselor  unless a client:
(a)  needs only limited services under this title for which expedited
procedures are appropriate; or
(b)  receives diversion assistance under Section 35A-3-303.
(3)  An employment counselor shall:
(a)  develop an employment plan jointly with the client; and
(b)  coordinate any services provided, brokered, or contracted for by the
department to that client.
(4)  The employment counselor assigned to a client may be selected because of
the employment counselor's experience or knowledge in the benefits or services
available under the title that best meet the specific needs of the client and
the employment counselor's skills in working with groups of clients to develop
plans leading to self-sufficiency.
(5) (a)  An employment counselor shall be:
(i)  trained in the requirements of and benefits or services provided through
employment centers in at least one of the following:
(A) Chapter 3, Employment Support Act; and
(B)  Chapter 5, Training and Workforce Improvement Act;
(ii)  capable of:
(A)  conducting an effective assessment;
(B)  negotiating an employment plan; and
(C)  providing the necessary encouragement and support to a client; and
(iii)  knowledgeable of:
(A)  department policies;
(B)  relevant law;
(C)  current labor market conditions;
(D)  education and training programs for adults; and
(E)  services and supports available in the community.
(b)  At the discretion of the director of a regional workforce services area,
an employment counselor may receive special training in the requirements of or
providing services under the statutes listed in Subsection (5)(a)(i).
(6) (a)  A client employment plan may include:
(i)  services and support necessary for stabilization;
(ii)  assessment and training; and
(iii)  placement.
(b)  The client employment plan shall consider the job opportunities available
to the client based on the job market.
(c)  The client employment plan shall be outcome-focused.
(7)  If a client seeks cash assistance under Chapter 3, Employment Support
Act, the assignment of an employment counselor and the creation and
implementation of an employment plan shall be consistent with Section
35A-3-304.
